Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2409
Statutes of limitation on decedent's cause of action.

No statute of limitations running on a cause of action belonging to a decedent which had not been barred as of the date of his death shall apply to bar a cause of action surviving the decedent's death sooner than four months after death. A cause of action which, but for this section, would have been barred less than four months after death is barred after four months unless tolled.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 87, UPC § 3-109.